Utah statutes.
10-2-408.   Denying or approving the annexation petition -- Notice of approval.

(1)  After receipt of the commission's decision on a protest under Subsection 10-2-416(2), a municipal legislative body may:

(a)  deny the annexation petition; or

(b)  if the commission approves the annexation, approve the annexation petition consistent with the commission's decision.

(2)  Within 10 days after approving an annexation under Subsection (1)(b) of an area that is partly or entirely within a township, the municipal legislative body shall send notice of the approval to the legislative body of the county in which the township is located.



Amended by Chapter 205, 2009 General Session

